Nevada, session 83, SB117.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 417.121 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.121 1. The Director shall conduct outreach to, and
provide assistance designed for the unique needs of, veterans and
members of the military who are lesbian, gay, bisexual or
transgender and their spouses and dependents, including, without
limitation [, providing] :
(a) Providing assistance in applying for an upgrade to the
character of the veteran’s discharge from service or a change in the
narrative reason for the veteran’s discharge from service [.] ; and
(b) Making available to any agency, resource center or
program in this State which provides services and resources to
veterans and members of the military regarding the benefits,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
services, programs and assistance available to veterans any
existing informational materials concerning the process for
applying for an upgrade to the character of the veteran’s
discharge from service or a change in the narrative reason for the
veteran’s discharge from service.
2. As used in this section, “veteran” means a resident of this
State who meets the qualifications of subsection 1 of NRS 417.005.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)